3rdparty/hunspell/tests/compoundforbid.aff
# Dictionary words with COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG are
# removed from the beginning and middle of
# compound words, overriding the effect of
# COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG.
#
# See compoundaffix3 test for basic usage
# of COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG.

COMPOUNDFLAG X
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Y
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG Z

SFX S Y 2
SFX S   0     bar/YX         .
SFX S   0     baz/YX         .
